Illinois, session 104th, HB1975.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $2, or so much of that amount as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Drycleaner Environmental Response Trust Fund 7Council for its ordinary and contingent expenses. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 92025.